Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 4
CAVE PROTECTION

12-4-140. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Cave Protection Act of 1977."

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 833, § 1.)

12-4-141. Legislative purpose.

The State of Georgia finds that caves are uncommon geologic phenomena and that the minerals deposited therein may be rare and occur in unique forms of great beauty which are irreplaceable if destroyed. It is also found that the wildlife which have evolved to live in caves are unusual and of limited numbers, and many are rare and endangered species, and that caves are a natural conduit for ground-water flow and are highly subject to water pollution, which has far-reaching effects transcending man's property boundaries. It is therefore declared to be the policy of this state and the intent of this article to protect these unique natural resources.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 833, § 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 12.)

12-4-142. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Cave" means any naturally occurring subterranean cavity, including, but not restricted to, a cavern, pit, pothole, natural well, sinkhole, and grotto.

"Commercial cave" means any cave with improved trails and lighting utilized by the owner for the purpose of exhibition to the general public as a profit or nonprofit enterprise, wherein a fee is collected for entry.

"Gate" means any structure or device located so as to limit or prohibit access or entry to a cave.

"Owner" means a person who owns title to land where a cave is located, including a person who owns title to a leasehold estate in such land, and specifically includes the state and any of its agencies, departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, or authorities, as well as counties, municipalities, and other political subdivisions of the state.

"Sinkhole" means a closed topographic depression or basin, generally draining underground, including, but not restricted to, a doline, limesink, or sink.

"Speleothem" means a natural mineral formation or deposit occurring in a cave, including, but not restricted to, stalagmites, stalactites, helectites, anthodites, gypsum flowers, gypsum needles, angel's hair, soda straws, draperies, bacon, cave pearls, popcorn (coral), rimstone dams, columns, palettes, and flowstone. Speleothems are commonly composed of calcite, epsomite, gypsum, aragonite, celestite, and other similar minerals.

"Wildlife" means any vertebrate or invertebrate animal life indigenous to this state or any species introduced or specified by the Board of Natural Resources and includes, but is not restricted to, quadrupeds, mammals, birds, fish, amphibians, reptiles, crustaceans, and mollusks, or any part thereof.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 833, § 3.)

12-4-143. Defacing or disturbing natural condition of cave; breaking or tampering with gates, doors, or other device controlling or preventing access to caves; trespass.

It shall be unlawful for any person, without the express written permission of the owner, willfully or knowingly to:

Break, break off, crack, carve upon, write upon, burn, or otherwise mark upon, remove, or in any manner destroy, disturb, deface, mar, or harm the surfaces of any cave or any natural or archeological material therein, including speleothems;

Disturb or alter in any manner the natural condition of any cave;

Break, force, tamper with, or otherwise disturb a lock, gate, door, or other obstruction designed to control or prevent access to any cave, even though entrance thereto may not be gained; or

Enter a cave posted against trespassing or a cave with a lock, gate, door, or other obstruction designed to control or prevent access to the cave.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 833, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1075, § 1.)

12-4-144. Sale or offer to sell speleothems.

It shall be unlawful to sell or offer for sale any speleothems in this state or to export them for sale outside this state without the express written permission of the owner of the cave from which such speleothems were obtained.

Any person violating this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 833, § 5.)

12-4-145. Storing hazardous or detrimental chemicals or materials in caves or sinkholes; dumping or disposing of garbage, dead animals, or similar materials in caves or sinkholes.

It shall be unlawful to store in caves or sinkholes any chemicals or other materials which may be detrimental or hazardous to caves or sinkholes, to the mineral deposits therein, to the wildlife inhabiting caves, to the waters of the state, or to the persons using such phenomena for any purposes.

It shall be unlawful to dump, litter, dispose of, or otherwise place any refuse, garbage, dead animals, sewage, trash, or other such similar waste materials in any quantity in any cave or sinkhole.

Any person who violates any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 833, § 6.)

12-4-146. Killing, harming, removing, or disturbing wildlife found in a cave.

It shall be unlawful to remove, kill, harm, or disturb any wildlife found within any cave, provided that nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to repeal Code Section 27-2-12, relating to scientific collectors' permits, or any rules or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, or any federal or state laws relating to the protection of certain plants or animals.

Any person who violates any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 833, § 7.)

12-4-147. Liability of owners of caves for injuries.

Neither the owner of a cave nor his authorized agents, officers, employees, or designated representatives acting within the scope of their authority shall be liable for injuries sustained by any person using such cave for recreational or scientific purposes if the prior consent of the owner has been obtained and if no charge has been made for the use of such features and notwithstanding that an inquiry as to the experience or expertise of the individual seeking consent may have been made.

Neither the owner of a commercial cave nor his authorized agents, officers, employees, or designated representatives acting within the scope of their authority shall be liable for an injury sustained by a spectator who has paid to view the cave, unless such injury is sustained as a result of such owner's negligence in connection with the providing and maintaining of trails, stairs, electrical wires, or other modifications, and such negligence shall be the proximate cause of the injury.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to constitute a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the state or any of its boards, departments, bureaus, or agencies.

(Ga. L. 1977, p. 833, § 8.)